District of Columbia statutes.
49-803

Companies, battalions, or regiments authorized to make rules.

Companies, battalions, or regiments may adopt constitutional articles of agreement or bylaws subject to the approval of the Commander-in-Chief, for the government of matters relating to the civic affairs of their respective organizations, the regulation of fines for nonperformance of duty, and the determination of causes upon which excuses from fines may be based; provided, however, that such articles or rules shall not be repugnant to law or the regulations for the government of the militia; and provided further, that the articles or rules adopted by any company or battalion shall not be repugnant to the articles or rules adopted for the general government of the regiment or battalion to which it belongs. Certified copies of such articles or rules, with like copies of all alterations, as finally approved by the Commanding General, shall be deposited in the office of the Adjutant General.

Mar. 1, 1889, 25 Stat. 780, ch. 328, § 59
Feb. 18, 1909, 35 Stat. 636, ch. 146, § 67
1981 Ed., § 39-903.
1973 Ed., § 39-903.